test/src/morphology/N-nyubye_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - нюмʼ: # Noun 'name' - partial paradigm /Type 26/
     нюмʼ+N+Sg+Nom: нюмʼ
     нюмʼ+N+Sg+Acc: нювмʼ
     нюмʼ+N+Sg+Gen: нювʼ
     нюмʼ+N+Sg+Dat: нюмдʼ
     нюмʼ+N+Sg+Loc: [нюмгана, нюмгна]
     нюмʼ+N+Sg+Abl: нюмгад
     нюмʼ+N+Sg+Pros: нюмна
     нюмʼ+N+Du+Nom: нюмгʼ
     нюмʼ+N+Du+Acc: нюмгʼ
     нюмʼ+N+Du+Gen: нюмгʼ
     нюмʼ+N+Pl+Nom: нювˮ
     нюмʼ+N+Pl+Acc: нюбе
     нюмʼ+N+Pl+Gen: нюбеˮ
     нюмʼ+N+Pl+Dat: нюмгˮ
     нюмʼ+N+Pl+Loc: [нюмгаˮна, нюмгˮна]
     нюмʼ+N+Pl+Abl: нюмгат
     нюмʼ+N+Pl+Pros: нюбеˮмана
     нюмʼ+N+Tra: нюмӈэ     
     нюмʼ+N+Car: нюмзиˮ
     нюмʼ+N+Equ: нюмдремʼ
     нюмʼ+N+Equ+Lat: нюмдревʼ

# Possessive forms 
     нюмʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: нюм
     нюмʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: нюмл  
     нюмʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: нюмда 
     нюмʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu1: нюмиʼ
     нюмʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu2: нюмлиʼ
     нюмʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu3: нюмдиʼ
     нюмʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1: нюмаˮ
     нюмʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2: нюмлаˮ
     нюмʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3: нюмдоʼ
     нюмʼ+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg1: [нюм, нюми]
     нюмʼ+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg2: нюмд  
     нюмʼ+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg3: нюмда 
     нюмʼ+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu1: нюмиʼ 
     нюмʼ+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu2: нюмдиʼ
     нюмʼ+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu3: нюмдиʼ
     нюмʼ+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl1: нюмваˮ 
     нюмʼ+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl2: нюмдаˮ
     нюмʼ+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl3: нюмдоʼ
     нюмʼ+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: [нюмн, нюмни] 
     нюмʼ+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg2: нюмнд  
     нюмʼ+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg3: нюмнда 
     нюмʼ+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: нюмниʼ 
     нюмʼ+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu2: нюмндиʼ
     нюмʼ+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu3: нюмндиʼ
     нюмʼ+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl1: нюмнаˮ 
     нюмʼ+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl2: нюмндаˮ
     нюмʼ+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl3: нюмндоʼ
     нюмʼ+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg1: [нюмган, нюмгани] 
     нюмʼ+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg2: нюмганд  
     нюмʼ+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg3: нюмганда 
     нюмʼ+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu1: [нюмганиʼ, нюмгниʼ] 
     нюмʼ+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu2: [нюмгандиʼ, нюмгндиʼ]
     нюмʼ+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu3: [нюмгандиʼ, нюмгндиʼ]
     нюмʼ+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl1: [нюмганаˮ, нюмгнаˮ]
     нюмʼ+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl2: [нюмгандаˮ, нюмгндаˮ]
     нюмʼ+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl3: [нюмгандоʼ, нюмгндоʼ]
     нюмʼ+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: [нюмганан, нюмгнан]
     нюмʼ+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: [нюмгананд, нюмгнанд]  
     нюмʼ+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg3: [нюмгананда, нюмгнанда]
     нюмʼ+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu1: [нюмгананиʼ, нюмгнаниʼ]
     нюмʼ+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu2: [нюмганандиʼ, нюмгнандиʼ]
     нюмʼ+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu3: [нюмганандиʼ, нюмгнандиʼ]
     нюмʼ+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl1: [нюмгананаˮ, нюмгнанаˮ] 
     нюмʼ+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl2: [нюмганандаˮ, нюмгнандаˮ]
     нюмʼ+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl3: [нюмганандоʼ, нюмгнандоʼ]
     нюмʼ+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg1: [нюмгадан, нюмгдан]   
     нюмʼ+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg1: [нюмгадани, нюмгдани]  
     нюмʼ+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg2: [нюмгаданд, нюмгданд]  
     нюмʼ+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg3: [нюмгаданда, нюмгданда] 
     нюмʼ+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu1: [нюмгаданиʼ, нюмгданиʼ]
     нюмʼ+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu2: [нюмгадандиʼ, нюмгдандиʼ]
     нюмʼ+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu3: [нюмгадандиʼ, нюмгдандиʼ]
     нюмʼ+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl1: [нюмгаданаˮ, нюмгданаˮ] 
     нюмʼ+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl2: [нюмгадандаˮ, нюмгдандаˮ]
     нюмʼ+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl3: [нюмгадандоʼ, нюмгдандоʼ]
     нюмʼ+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg1: нюмнан   
     нюмʼ+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg1: нюмнани  
     нюмʼ+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg2: нюмнанд  
     нюмʼ+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg3: нюмнанда 
     нюмʼ+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu1: нюмнаниʼ 
     нюмʼ+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu2: нюмнандиʼ
     нюмʼ+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu3: нюмнандиʼ
     нюмʼ+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl1: нюмнанаˮ 
     нюмʼ+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl2: нюмнандаˮ
     нюмʼ+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl3: нюмнандоʼ
     нюмʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1: [нюмгаюн, нюмгюн]
     нюмʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxSg2: [нюмгаюд, нюмгюд]
     нюмʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxSg3: [нюмгаюда, нюмгюда]
     нюмʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxDu1: [нюмгаюниʼ, нюмгюниʼ]
     нюмʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxDu2: [нюмгаюдиʼ, нюмгюдиʼ]
     нюмʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxDu3: [нюмгаюдиʼ, нюмгюдиʼ]
     нюмʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxPl1: [нюмгаюнаˮ, нюмгюнаˮ]
     нюмʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxPl2: [нюмгаюдаˮ, нюмгюдаˮ]
     нюмʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxPl3: [нюмгаюдоʼ, нюмгюдоʼ]
     нюмʼ+N+Du+Acc+PxSg1: [нюмгаюн, нюмгюн]
     нюмʼ+N+Du+Acc+PxSg2: [нюмгаюд, нюмгюд]
     нюмʼ+N+Du+Acc+PxSg3: [нюмгаюда , нюмгюда]
     нюмʼ+N+Du+Acc+PxDu1: [нюмгаюниʼ, нюмгюниʼ]
     нюмʼ+N+Du+Acc+PxDu2: [нюмгаюдиʼ, нюмгюдиʼ]
     нюмʼ+N+Du+Acc+PxDu3: [нюмгаюдиʼ, нюмгюдиʼ]
     нюмʼ+N+Du+Acc+PxPl1: [нюмгаюнаˮ, нюмгюнаˮ]
     нюмʼ+N+Du+Acc+PxPl2: [нюмгаюдаˮ, нюмгюдаˮ]
     нюмʼ+N+Du+Acc+PxPl3: [нюмгаюдоʼ, нюмгюдоʼ]
     нюмʼ+N+Du+Gen+PxSg1: [нюмгаюн, нюмгюн]
     нюмʼ+N+Du+Gen+PxSg2: [нюмгают, нюмгют]
     нюмʼ+N+Du+Gen+PxSg3: [нюмгаюта, нюмгюта]
     нюмʼ+N+Du+Gen+PxDu1: [нюмгаюниʼ, нюмгюниʼ]
     нюмʼ+N+Du+Gen+PxDu2: [нюмгаютиʼ, нюмгютиʼ]
     нюмʼ+N+Du+Gen+PxDu3: [нюмгаютиʼ, нюмгютиʼ]
     нюмʼ+N+Du+Gen+PxPl1: [нюмгаюнаˮ, нюмгюнаˮ]
     нюмʼ+N+Du+Gen+PxPl2: [нюмгаютаˮ, нюмгютаˮ]
     нюмʼ+N+Du+Gen+PxPl3: [нюмгаютоʼ, нюмгютоʼ]
     нюмʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: [нювон, нювони]
     нюмʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2: нювод   
     нюмʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3: нювода  
     нюмʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu1: нювониʼ 
     нюмʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu2: нюводиʼ 
     нюмʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu3: нюводиʼ 
     нюмʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1: нювонаˮ 
     нюмʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2: нюводаˮ 
     нюмʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3: нюводоʼ 
     нюмʼ+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg1: [нювон, нювони]   
     нюмʼ+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg2: нювод   
     нюмʼ+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg3: нювода  
     нюмʼ+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu1: нювониʼ 
     нюмʼ+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu2: нюводиʼ 
     нюмʼ+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu3: нюводиʼ 
     нюмʼ+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl1: нювонаˮ 
     нюмʼ+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl2: нюводаˮ 
     нюмʼ+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl3: нюводоʼ 
     нюмʼ+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1: нювоˮн  
     нюмʼ+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg2: нювот   
     нюмʼ+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg3: нювота  
     нюмʼ+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu1: нювоˮниʼ
     нюмʼ+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu2: нювотиʼ 
     нюмʼ+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu3: нювотиʼ 
     нюмʼ+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl1: нювоˮнаˮ 
     нюмʼ+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl2: нювотаˮ 
     нюмʼ+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl3: нювотоʼ 
     нюмʼ+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg1: нюмгаˮн
     нюмʼ+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg2: нюмгат
     нюмʼ+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg3: [нюмгата, нюмгта]
     нюмʼ+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu1: [нюмгаˮниʼ, нюмгˮниʼ]
     нюмʼ+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu2: [нюмгатиʼ, нюмгтиʼ]
     нюмʼ+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu3: [нюмгатиʼ, нюмгтиʼ]
     нюмʼ+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl1: [нюмгаˮнаˮ, нюмгˮнаˮ]
     нюмʼ+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl2: [нюмгатаˮ, нюмгтаˮ]
     нюмʼ+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl3: [нюмгатоʼ, нюмгтоʼ]
     нюмʼ+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg1: [нюмгаˮнан, нюмгˮнан]
     нюмʼ+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg2: [нюмгаˮнат, нюмгˮнат]
     нюмʼ+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg3: [нюмгаˮната, нюмгˮната]
     нюмʼ+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu1: [нюмгаˮнаниʼ, нюмгˮнаниʼ]
     нюмʼ+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu2: [нюмгаˮнатиʼ, нюмгˮнатиʼ]
     нюмʼ+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu3: [нюмгаˮнатиʼ, нюмгˮнатиʼ]
     нюмʼ+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl1: [нюмгаˮнанаˮ, нюмгˮнанаˮ]
     нюмʼ+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl2: [нюмгаˮнатаˮ, нюмгˮнатаˮ]
     нюмʼ+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl3: [нюмгаˮнатоʼ, нюмгˮнатоʼ]
     нюмʼ+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg1: [нюмгатан, нюмгтан]
     нюмʼ+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg2: [нюмгатат, нюмгтат]
     нюмʼ+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg3: [нюмгатата, нюмгтата]
     нюмʼ+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu1: [нюмгатаниʼ, нюмгтаниʼ]
     нюмʼ+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu2: [нюмгататиʼ, нюмгтатиʼ]
     нюмʼ+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu3: [нюмгататиʼ, нюмгтатиʼ]
     нюмʼ+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl1: [нюмгатанаˮ, нюмгтанаˮ]
     нюмʼ+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl2: [нюмгататаˮ, нюмгтатаˮ]
     нюмʼ+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl3: [нюмгататоʼ, нюмгтатоʼ]
     нюмʼ+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg1: нюбеˮманан  
     нюмʼ+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg2: нюбеˮманат  
     нюмʼ+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg3: нюбеˮманата 
     нюмʼ+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu1: нюбеˮмананиʼ
     нюмʼ+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu2: нюбеˮманатиʼ
     нюмʼ+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu3: нюбеˮманатиʼ
     нюмʼ+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl1: нюбеˮмананаˮ
     нюмʼ+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl2: нюбеˮманатаˮ
     нюмʼ+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl3: нюбеˮманатоʼ

# Predestinative

     нюмʼ+N+Pred+Abs: нюмд
     нюмʼ+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg1: [нюмдав, нюмдув] 
     нюмʼ+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg2: нюмдар  
     нюмʼ+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg3: нюмдада
     нюмʼ+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg1: [нюмдав, нюмдув]
     нюмʼ+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg2: нюмдамд
     нюмʼ+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg3: нюмдамда
     нюмʼ+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg1: нюмдан
     нюмʼ+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg2: нюмданд
     нюмʼ+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg3: нюмданда
     нюмʼ+N+Pred+Nom+PxDu1: нюмдамиʼ
     нюмʼ+N+Pred+Nom+PxDu2: нюмдариʼ
     нюмʼ+N+Pred+Nom+PxDu3: нюмдадиʼ
     нюмʼ+N+Pred+Acc+PxDu1: нюмдамиʼ
     нюмʼ+N+Pred+Acc+PxDu2: нюмдамдиʼ
     нюмʼ+N+Pred+Acc+PxDu3: нюмдамдиʼ
     нюмʼ+N+Pred+Gen+PxDu1: нюмданиʼ
     нюмʼ+N+Pred+Gen+PxDu2: нюмдандиʼ
     нюмʼ+N+Pred+Gen+PxDu3: нюмдандиʼ
     нюмʼ+N+Pred+Nom+PxPl1: нюмдаваˮ
     нюмʼ+N+Pred+Nom+PxPl2: нюмдараˮ
     нюмʼ+N+Pred+Nom+PxPl3: нюмдадоʼ
     нюмʼ+N+Pred+Acc+PxPl1: нюмдаваˮ
     нюмʼ+N+Pred+Acc+PxPl2: нюмдамдаˮ
     нюмʼ+N+Pred+Acc+PxPl3: нюмдамдоʼ
     нюмʼ+N+Pred+Gen+PxPl1: нюмданаˮ
     нюмʼ+N+Pred+Gen+PxPl2: нюмдандаˮ
     нюмʼ+N+Pred+Gen+PxPl3: нюмдандоʼ
     
# Predicative (Nominal conjugation)

     нюмʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg1: нюмдмʼ
     нюмʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg2: нюмд  
     нюмʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: нюмʼ 
     нюмʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu1: нюмниʼ
     нюмʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu2: нюмдиʼ
     нюмʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: нюмгʼ
     нюмʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl1: нюмаˮ
     нюмʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl2: нюмдаˮ
     нюмʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: нювˮ  
     нюмʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1: нюмдамзь
     нюмʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2: нюмдась 
     нюмʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: нюмзь   
     нюмʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu1: нюмнинзь
     нюмʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu2: нюмдинзь
     нюмʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: нюмганзь
     нюмʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1: нюмаць 
     нюмʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2: нюмдаць 
     нюмʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: нюваць   
